California statutes. Financial Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 19.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1512 of the SAFE Act, the requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to that information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with applicable oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law.

(b) For these purposes, the commissioner is authorized to enter agreements or share arrangements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, or other associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner.

(c) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the following:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the state.

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to the information or material, the person to whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of the person, that privilege.

(3) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by the public. 

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 34.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.4.

The commissioner shall regularly report violations of this division, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, to the extent that information is public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 21.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.

(a) The finance lender, broker, or program administrator license shall state the name of the licensee, and if the licensee is a partnership, the names of its general partners, and if a corporation or an association, the date and place of its incorporation or organization, and the address of the licensee’s principal business location. On the approval and licensing of a location pursuant to Section 22101 or 22102, the commissioner shall issue an original license endorsed to show the address of the authorized location and, if applicable, the name of the subsidiary corporation licensed to operate the location. The license shall state whether the licensee is licensed as a finance lender, broker, or program administrator.

(b) (1) An application for a license for a business location outside this state shall constitute an agreement by the applicant to do all of the following:

(A) Make the licensee’s books, accounts, papers, records, and files available to the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives in this state.

(B) Pay the reasonable expenses for travel, meals, and lodging of the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives incurred during any investigation or examination made at the licensee’s location outside this state.

(2) A licensee located outside this state is not required to maintain books and records regarding licensed loans separate from those for other loans if the licensed loans can be readily identified. 

(c) This section shall
 become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 35) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 36.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22107.

(a) Each finance lender, broker, or program administrator licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses, including the costs and expenses associated with the licensing of mortgage loan originators it employs, reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, as estimated by the commissioner, for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the program in the year in which the assessment is made. The pro rata share shall be the proportion that a licensee’s gross income bears to the aggregate gross income of all licensees as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner, for the costs and expenses remaining after the amount assessed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) On or before September 30th in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid by October 31. If payment is not made by October 31, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.

(c) In the levying and collection of the assessment, a licensee shall neither be assessed for nor be permitted to pay less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per licensed location per year.

(d) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the October 31st, the commissioner may by
 order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the licensee. If, after an order is made, a request for a hearing is filed in writing within 30 days, and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a finance lender, broker, or program administrator licensee and any mortgage loan originator licensee employed by the finance lender or broker shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.

(e) The commissioner shall, by rule, establish the timelines, fees, and assessments applicable to applicants for original mortgage loan originator licenses, license renewals, and license changes under this division.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, the commissioner may by rule require licensees to pay assessments through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. 

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 37) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 38.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22108.

(a) The commissioner may by rule require licensees to file, at the times that he or she may specify, the information that he or she may reasonably require regarding any changes in the information provided in any application filed pursuant to this division.

(b) The commissioner may by rule require a licensee to file information through
 the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 23.5.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.

(a) Upon reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may deny the application for a finance lender, broker, or program administrator license for any of the following reasons:

(1) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application.

(2) The applicant or an officer, director, general partner, person responsible for the applicant’s lending activities or administering PACE programs for the applicant in this state, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant has, within the last 10 years,
 been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime, or committed an act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division.

(3) The applicant or an officer, director, general partner, person responsible for the applicant’s lending activities or administering PACE programs for the applicant in this state, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of the State of California or a foreign jurisdiction.

(4) The applicant employs a mortgage loan originator who is not licensed, or has not initiated an application to become licensed, pursuant to
 this division.

(b) The application shall be considered withdrawn within the meaning of this section if the applicant fails to respond to a written notification of a deficiency in the application within 90 days of the date of the notification.

(c) The commissioner shall, within 60 days from the filing of a full and complete application for a license with the fees, either issue a license or file a statement of issues prepared in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 39) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 40.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.1.

(a) The commissioner shall deny an application for a mortgage loan originator license unless the commissioner makes, at a minimum, the following findings:

(1) The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of a revocation shall not be deemed a revocation.

(2) (A) The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration, or at any time preceding the date of application, if
 the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering. Whether a particular crime is classified as a felony shall be determined by the law of the jurisdiction in which an individual is convicted.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, an expunged or pardoned felony conviction shall not require denial of an application. However, the commissioner may consider the underlying crime, facts, or circumstances of an expunged or pardoned felony conviction when determining the eligibility of an applicant for licensure under this paragraph or paragraph (3).

(3) The applicant has demonstrated such financial responsibility, character, and general fitness as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this division.

(4) The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in Section 22109.2.

(5) The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in Section 22109.3.

(6) The applicant is employed by, and subject to the supervision of, a finance lender or broker that has obtained a license from the commissioner pursuant to this division.

(b) Before denying a license under this section, the commissioner shall proceed as prescribed by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall have all the powers granted under that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 444, Sec. 3.   (SB 217)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.2.

(a) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator license shall complete at least 20 hours of education approved in accordance with subdivision (b). The education shall include at least the following:

(1) Three hours of instruction on federal law and regulations.

(2) Three hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues.

(3) Two hours of training related to lending standards for the
 nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(4) Two hours of training related to relevant California law and regulations.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), prelicensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or
 entity.

(d) Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(e) The prelicensing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for any state other than California shall be accepted as credit toward completion of prelicensing education requirements in California.

(f) An individual previously licensed under this division as a mortgage loan originator, applying to be licensed again, shall prove that he or she has completed all of the continuing education requirements for the year in which the license was last held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.3.

(a) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator license shall pass a qualified written test developed or otherwise deemed acceptable by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(b) A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of subdivision (a) unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate
 subject areas, including all of the following:

(1) Ethics.

(2) Federal law and regulation relating to mortgage origination.

(3) State law and regulation relating to mortgage origination.

(4) Federal and state law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair lending issues.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant,
 or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

(d) An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test administered pursuant to this section unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than 75 percent of correct answers to questions.

(e) An individual who fails the qualified written test may retake the test up to three consecutive times, although at least 30 days shall pass between each retesting.

(f) An applicant who fails three consecutive retests shall wait at least six months before retesting.

(g) A licensed mortgage loan originator
 who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five years or longer shall retake the test, not taking into account any time during which the individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 123, Sec. 2.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.4.

(a) A mortgage loan originator shall comply with the requirements of this section on or before December 31 of every year.

(b) The minimum standards for license renewal for a mortgage loan originator shall include the following:

(1) The mortgage loan originator continues to
 meet the minimum standards for license issuance under Section 22109.1.

(2) The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in Section 22109.5.

(3) The mortgage loan originator, or the finance lender or broker employing the mortgage loan originator, has paid all required fees for renewal of the license as provided in Section 22107.

(c) The license of a mortgage loan originator failing to satisfy the minimum standards for license renewal shall expire at midnight on December 31, except as provided in subdivision (h) of Section 22109.5. The commissioner may adopt procedures for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 287, Sec. 9.   (SB 1137)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.5.

(a) A licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight hours of continuing education approved in accordance with subdivision (b). The continuing education shall include at least the following:

(1) Three hours of instruction on federal law and regulations.

(2) Two hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues.

(3) Two hours of training related to lending standards for the
 nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(4) One hour of training related to relevant California law and regulations.

(b) For purposes of this section, continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity which is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the
 employer or entity.

(d) Continuing education may be offered in a classroom, online, and by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (i), a licensed mortgage loan originator:

(1) May only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken.

(2) May not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

(f) A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course
 may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours credit for every one hour taught.

(g) A person who has successfully completed continuing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for any state other than California shall be granted credit toward completion of continuing education requirements in California.

(h) A licensed mortgage loan originator who subsequently becomes unlicensed shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license.

(i) A person meeting the requirements of paragraphs (1) and
 (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 22109.4 may correct any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule or regulation of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 123, Sec. 3.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.6.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner shall require mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this requirement, the commissioner is authorized to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the commissioner may establish by rule, regulation, or order, requirements as necessary, including, but
 not limited to, the following:

(a) Background information for the following:

(1) Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases.

(2) Civil or administrative records.

(3) Credit history.

(4) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew licenses through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(c) The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates.

(d) Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other activities as the commissioner deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 30.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22110.

The proceedings for a denial of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22111.

All money paid or collected under this division shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Corporations Fund. The administration of this division shall be supported out of the State Corporations Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22112.

(a) A licensee shall maintain a surety bond in accordance with this subdivision in a minimum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The bond shall be payable to the commissioner and issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. An original surety bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be filed with the
 commissioner within 10 days of execution. For licensees with multiple licensed locations, only one surety bond is required. The bond shall be used for the recovery of expenses, fines, and fees levied by the commissioner in accordance with this division or for losses or damages incurred by borrowers or consumers as the result of a licensee’s noncompliance with the requirements of this division.

(b) When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon recovery of any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond. Failure to file a new bond within 10 days of the recovery on a bond, or within 10 days after notification by the commissioner that a new bond is required, constitutes sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license.

(c) The commissioner may by rule require a higher bond amount
 for a licensee who employs one or more mortgage loan originators and who makes or arranges residential mortgage loans, based on the dollar amount of residential mortgage loans originated by that licensee and any mortgage loan originators employed by that licensee. Every mortgage loan originator employed by the licensee shall be covered by the surety bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 287, Sec. 10.   (SB 1137)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regulations [22150. - 22172.]

22150.

The commissioner may make general rules and regulations and specific rulings, demands, and findings for the enforcement of this division, in addition to, and within the general purposes of, this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22151.

(a) A finance lender license, broker license, program administrator license, and the license of every mortgage loan originator employed by a lender or finance broker, along with any currently effective order of the commissioner approving a different name pursuant to Section 22155, shall be conspicuously posted in the place of business authorized by the license.

(b) A license is not transferable or assignable. A license issued to a partnership or a limited partnership is not transferred or assigned within the meaning of this section by the death, withdrawal, or admission of a partner, general partner, or limited partner, unless the death, withdrawal, or admission dissolves the partnership to which the license was issued.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 41) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 42.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22152.

(a) A finance lender, broker, or program administrator licensee shall maintain only one place of business under a duplicate or original license issued pursuant to Section 22101 or 22102. The commissioner may issue more than one license to the same licensee upon compliance with all the provisions of this division governing an original issuance of a license.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 43) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 44.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22153.

(a) If a finance lender, broker, or program administrator licensee seeks to change its place of business to a street address other than that designated in its license, the licensee shall provide notice to the commissioner at least 10 days before the change. The commissioner shall notify the licensee within 10 days if the commissioner disapproves the change, and if the commissioner does not notify the licensee of disapproval within 10 days, the change in address shall be deemed approved. The commissioner may require an applicant to submit its application to change its place of business through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(b) If notice is not given at least 10 days before the change of a street address of a place of
 business, as required by subdivision (a), or notice is not given at least 10 days before engaging in business at a new location, as required by Section 22102, the commissioner may assess a civil or administrative penalty on the licensee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). 

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 45) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 46.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22154.

(a) Subject to Section 22157.1, a licensee shall not conduct the business of making loans or administering a PACE program under this division within any office, room, or place of business in which any other business is solicited or engaged in, or in association or conjunction therewith, except as is authorized in writing by the commissioner upon the commissioner’s finding that the character of the other business is such that the granting of the authority would not facilitate evasions of this division or of the rules and regulations made pursuant to this division. An authorization, once granted, remains in effect until revoked by the commissioner. The commissioner may authorize the other business through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(b) The
 products or services of an affiliated corporation of the licensee that is a supervised financial institution, or a parent or subsidiary of a supervised financial institution that is an affiliate of the licensee, may be provided, offered, or sold at the licensed location of the licensee without authorization by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a) if both of the following are met:

(1) The activity is not prohibited by, or in violation of, the laws applicable to the affiliate or supervised financial institution.

(2) The products and services are not offered and sold in a manner that restricts the ability of the borrower or customer to individually select or reject a product or service that is offered.

(c) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Affiliated” or “affiliate” means the following: A corporation is an affiliate of, or a corporation is affiliated with, another specified corporation if it directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other specified corporation.

(2) “Supervised financial institution” means any commercial bank, industrial bank, credit card bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, California finance lender, residential mortgage lender or servicer, or insurer, provided that the institution is subject to supervision by an official or agency of this state or of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (AB 2001)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22155.

Subject to Section 22157.1, a finance lender, broker, mortgage loan originator, or program administrator licensee shall not transact the business licensed or make any loan or administer any PACE program provided for by this division under any other name or at any other place of business than that named in the license except pursuant to a currently effective written order of the commissioner authorizing the other name or other place of business. The commissioner’s order, while effective, shall be deemed to amend the original license issued pursuant to Section 22105 or 22109.1. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a finance lender, program administrator, broker, or mortgage loan originator licensee may make any loan and engage in any other business provided for by this division, other than the business described in subdivision (b) of Section
 22154, at a place other than the licensed location under either of the following conditions:

(a) The borrower requests, either orally or in writing, that a loan be initiated or made at a location other than the licensee’s licensed location. The use by the licensee of a preprinted solicitation form returned to the licensee by the borrower shall not constitute a request by the borrower that a loan be initiated or made at a location other than the licensee’s licensed location.

(b) The licensee makes a solicitation or advertises for, or makes an offer of, a loan or assessment contract displayed on “home pages” or similar methods by the licensee on the internet, the World Wide Web, or similar proprietary or common carrier electronic systems, and the prospective borrower or property owner may transmit information over these electronic systems to the licensee in connection with the
 licensee’s offer to make a loan or assessment contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   (AB 2001)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.

(a) Finance lender, broker, program administrator, and mortgage loan originator licensees shall keep and use in their business, books, accounts, and records which will enable the commissioner to determine if the licensee is complying with the provisions of this division and with the rules and regulations made by the commissioner. On any loan secured by real property in which loan proceeds were disbursed to an independent escrowholder, the licensee shall retain records and documents as set forth by rules of the commissioner adopted pursuant to Section 22150. Upon request of the commissioner, licensees shall file an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of the licensed business pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 51) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 52.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22157.

(a) Finance lender, broker, and mortgage loan originator licensees shall preserve their books, accounts, and records, if any, for at least three years after making the final entry on any loan recorded therein.

(b) Except as otherwise specified by applicable law, including paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5913 of the Streets and Highways Code, program administrator licensees shall preserve their books, accounts, and records for at least three years after the extinguishment of a PACE assessment is recorded therein.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 54) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 4.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22157.1.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Encrypted” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (i) of Section 1798.82 of the Civil Code.

(2) “Remote location” means a personal residence or a temporary, nonpublic location not owned or leased by the licensee or an affiliate of the licensee that is not simultaneously accessible by anyone other than a single employee and individuals who maintain a common household with the employee.

(b) A licensee may designate an employee, when acting within the scope of employment, to perform work on the licensee’s behalf at a remote location if the licensee does
 all of the following:

(1) Prohibits in-person consumer interactions, including the physical receipt of cash or other monetary value or the disbursement of loan proceeds, at a remote location and does not designate a remote location to the public as a business location.

(2) Prohibits records required pursuant to Section 22156 from being physically mailed to, shipped to, or stored at a remote location except for storage on an encrypted device or encrypted media.

(3) Prohibits the physical receipt of mail related to the licensee’s licensed business at a remote location. 

(4) Prohibits a consumer’s personal information from being physically stored at a remote location except for storage on an encrypted device or encrypted media.

(5) Provides an employee working at a remote location with appropriate equipment, which may include encrypted devices, virtual private networks, and similar technology, to perform work and safeguard licensee records and consumer personal information.

(6) Adopts and adheres to appropriate, as determined by the department, written policies and procedures to supervise and maintain appropriate control over the work of employees at remote locations and safeguard the licensee’s records and consumer personal information in connection with work at a remote location, including, but not limited to, all of the following elements:

(A) Employee data security training.

(B) Maintenance of security logs of remote logins.

(C) Procedures designed to detect suspicious logins or attempted logins and to suspend access by potentially compromised accounts or equipment.

(D) Data breach response procedures.

(7) (A) Records telephone calls with consumers conducted from a remote location to the same extent as telephone calls with consumers conducted from licensed locations.

(B) This paragraph does not require telephone call recording if the licensee does not do so in the normal course of business for the employee or business in question.

(8) All books, records, and persons that the commissioner is entitled to examine, inspect, or interview shall be made available to the commissioner at a licensed
 location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 181, Sec. 3.   (AB 2001)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22158.

Nothing contained in Sections 22156 and 22157 shall require the maintenance or preservation of original records, provided that any information requested by the commissioner can be furnished within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays as defined in Sections 6700 and 6701 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22159.

(a) Each finance lender, broker, and program administrator licensee shall file an annual report with the commissioner, on or before March 15th, giving the relevant information that the commissioner reasonably requires concerning the business and operations conducted by the licensee or authorized by the program administrator licensee within the state during the preceding calendar year for each licensed place of business. The individual annual reports filed pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public for inspection except, upon request in the annual report to the commissioner, the balance sheet contained in the annual report of a sole proprietor or any other nonpublicly traded person. “Nonpublicly traded person” for purposes of this section means persons with securities owned by 35 or fewer
 individuals. The report shall be made under oath and in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(b) A licensee shall make other special reports that may be required by the commissioner.

(c) The commissioner may require a licensee that employs one or more mortgage loan originators to submit to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, which shall be in the form and shall contain the information as the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may require.

(d) The commissioner may by rule or order require a mortgage loan originator to submit reports of condition to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, in lieu of the reports of
 condition required of his or her employer pursuant to subdivision (c). 

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 55) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 56.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22159.5.
